Illinois, session 104th, SB2968.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Treasurer Act is amended by adding 5Section 17.2 as follows: 6    (15 ILCS 505/17.2 new)7    Sec. 17.2. Non-profit investment pool.8    (a) The State Treasurer may establish and administer a 9non-profit investment pool and an electronic payment 10processing program to supplement and enhance investment 11opportunities and secure electronic payment options otherwise 12available to not-for-profit corporations in this State.13    (b) The Treasurer may receive funds paid into the 14non-profit investment pool by a not-for-profit corporation 15that is exempt from taxation under Section 501(c)(3), 16501(c)(4), 501(c)(5), or 501(c)(6) of the Internal Revenue 17Code for the purpose of holding and investing those funds. In 18order to be eligible to participate in the non-profit 19investment pool, the not-for-profit corporation shall:20        (1) provide the Treasurer with a copy of the most 21    recent audited financial statement or charitable 22    organization annual report filed with the Attorney 23    General;  SB2968 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 18491 SPS 31933 b1        (2) be domiciled in Illinois;2        (3) not be on the federal system for award management 3    (SAM) exclusion list;4        (4) not be on the Chief Procurement Officer's 5    suspensions, debarments, voluntary exclusions, and 6    voluntary non-participation agreements list;7        (5) not be on the Department of Labor's debarred 8    contractors list;9        (6) not be on the Illinois Stop Payment List 10    established under the Grant Accountability and 11    Transparency Act; and12        (7) be at least one of the following: 13            (A) a Medicaid certified provider that is not on 14        the Department of Healthcare and Family Services' 15        provider sanctions list;16            (B) an organization that held certification under 17        the Grant Accountability and Transparency Act at any 18        time within the previous 8 years prior to the 19        transmittal of funds to the Treasurer or is a current 20        grantee or subgrantee of the State;21            (C) a labor organization registered with the 22        United States Department of Labor; or23            (D) an organization whose mission involves a 24        purpose or cause related to one of the following:25                (i) legal aid services for people with low 26            incomes;  SB2968 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 18491 SPS 31933 b1                (ii) services for military veterans;2                (iii) scientific and medical research;3                (iv) neighborhood and community development;4                (v) affordable housing or housing assistance;5                (vi) public pre-kindergarten through grade 12, 6            public career and technical education, or public 7            higher education access and scholarships;8                (vii) publicly funded libraries, publicly 9            funded museums, or public broadcasting;10                (viii) support for firefighting and EMS 11            services;12                (ix) emergency assistance and disaster relief;13                (x) food banks and food pantries;14                (xi) environmental protection and 15            preservation;16                (xii) animal shelters, humane societies, or 17            anti-animal cruelty society;18                (xiii) cultural and performing arts;19                (xiv) job training, employment placement, or 20            other employment-related community-based 21            services;22                (xv) services for victims of domestic 23            violence; or24                (xvi) services for seniors and people with 25            disabilities.26    (c) The Treasurer may invest the funds constituting the   SB2968 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 18491 SPS 31933 b1non-profit investment pool in the same manner, in the same 2types of investments, and subject to the same limitations 3provided for the investment of funds in the State Treasury. 4The Treasurer shall develop, publish, and implement an 5investment policy covering the management of funds in the 6non-profit investment pool. The policy shall be published each 7year as part of the audit of the non-profit investment pool by 8the Auditor General, which shall be distributed to all 9participants. The Treasurer shall notify all non-profit 10investment pool participants in writing, and the Treasurer 11shall publish in at least one newspaper of general circulation 12in both Springfield and Chicago any changes to a previously 13published investment policy at least 30 calendar days before 14implementing the policy. Any investment policy adopted by the 15Treasurer shall be reviewed, and updated if necessary, within 1690 days after the installation of a new Treasurer.17    (d) The Treasurer shall adopt rules for the efficient 18administration of the non-profit investment pool, including 19the minimum amounts that may be deposited in the non-profit 20investment pool and the minimum period of time that deposits 21shall be retained in the non-profit investment pool. The rules 22shall provide for the administrative expenses of the 23non-profit investment pool to be paid from its earnings and 24for the interest earnings in excess of such expenses to be 25credited or paid monthly to the not-for-profit corporations 26participating in the non-profit investment pool in a manner   SB2968 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 18491 SPS 31933 b1which equitably reflects the differing amounts of their 2respective investments in the non-profit investment pool and 3the differing periods of time for which the amounts were in the 4custody of the non-profit investment pool.5    (e) Upon creating a non-profit investment pool, the State 6Treasurer shall give bond with 2 or more sufficient sureties, 7payable to not-for-profit corporations that participate in the 8non-profit investment pool for the benefit of the 9not-for-profit corporations that have funds that are paid into 10the non-profit investment pool for investment, in the penal 11sum of $150,000, conditioned for the faithful discharge of the 12State Treasurer's duties in relation to the non-profit 13investment pool.